Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-1202
Social services;
services included.

Social services may be provided
on behalf of recipients with payments for such social services made directly
to vendors. Social services shall include those mandatory and optional services
to former, present, or potential social services recipients provided for under
the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and described by the State of
Nebraska in the approved State Plan for Services. Such services may include,
but shall not be limited to, foster care for children, child care, family
planning, treatment for alcoholism and drug addiction, treatment for persons
with an intellectual disability, health-related
services, protective services for children, homemaker services, employment
services, foster care for adults, protective services for adults, transportation
services, home management and other functional education services, housing
improvement services, legal services, adult day services, home delivered or
congregate meals, educational services, and secondary prevention services,
including, but not limited to, home visitation, child screening and early
intervention, and parenting education programs.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 28;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 82;

Laws 2005, LB 264, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB177, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 15.